Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Rates of Common Carriers

§ 77-7-211.
Filing, publication and posting of rates of common carriers; rejection of tariff by commission.

Every common carrier of passengers shall file with the commission, and print and keep open for public inspection, tariffs showing all the rates, fares and charges for transportation, and all services in connection therewith, between points on its own route, and between points on its own route and points on the route of any other such carrier, or on the route of any common carrier by railroad, express or water, when a through route and joint rate has been established. Such rates, fares and charges shall be stated in terms of lawful money of the United States. The tariffs required by this section shall be published, filed and posted in such form and manner, and shall contain such information as the commission by regulation shall prescribe. The commission is authorized to reject any tariff filed with it which is not in consonance with this section and with such regulations. Any tariff so rejected by the commission shall be void and its use shall be unlawful.

No common carrier of passengers, unless otherwise provided by this chapter, shall engage in the transportation of passengers unless the rates, fares and charges upon which the same are transported by the carrier have been filed and published in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7666; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 13; Laws, 2004, ch. 501, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 77-7-213.
Common carriers shall charge only rates set forth in tariff.

No common carrier by motor vehicle, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this chapter, shall charge, demand, collect or receive a greater, less or different compensation for transportation or for any service in connection therewith between the points enumerated in its tariff than the rates, fares and charges specified in the tariffs in effect at the time. No such carrier shall refund or remit in any manner or by any device, directly or indirectly, or through any agent, or otherwise, any portion of the rates, fares or charges so specified, or extend to any person any privileges or facilities for transportation except such as are specified in its tariffs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7666; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 14; Laws, 2004, ch. 501, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 77-7-215.
Change in rates by common carriers; notice to be given.

No change shall be made in any rate, fare, charge or classification, or any rule, regulation or practice affecting such rate, fare, charge or classification, or the value of the service thereunder, specified in any elective tariff of a common carrier by motor vehicle, except after thirty (30) days’ notice of the proposed change, and upon thirty (30) days’ notice to all interested carriers, to be given by the carrier proposing such change, filed and posted in accordance with Section 77-7-211. Such notice shall plainly state the change proposed to be made and the time when such change will take effect. The commission may, in its discretion and for good cause shown, allow such change upon notice less than that herein specified, or modify the requirements of this section with respect to posting and filing of tariffs, either in particular instances or by general order applicable to special or peculiar circumstances or conditions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7666; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995).

§ 77-7-217.
Commission hearings upon reasonableness of rates of common carriers.

Any person, state board, organization or body politic may make complaint in writing to the commission that any such rate, fare, charge, classification, rule, regulation or practice in effect, or proposed to be put into effect, is or will be in violation of Sections 77-7-153, 77-7-187, 77-7-211 through 77-7-215.The provisions of this section shall not apply to common carriers of household goods.

Whenever, after hearing, upon complaint or in an investigation on its own initiative, the commission is of the opinion that any individual or joint rate, fare or charge, demanded, charged or collected by any common carrier or carriers by motor vehicle or by any common carrier or carriers by motor vehicle in conjunction with any common carrier or carriers by railroad or express, or water, or any classification, rule, regulation or practice whatsoever of such carrier or carriers affecting such rate, fare or charge or the value of the service thereunder, is or will be unjust or unreasonable, or unjustly discriminatory or unduly preferential or unduly prejudicial, it shall determine and prescribe the lawful rate, fare or charge thereunder to be observed, or the lawful classification, rule, regulation or practice thereafter to be made effective.

The commission shall, whenever deemed by it to be necessary or desirable in the public interest, after hearing, upon complaint or upon its own initiative without a complaint, establish through routes, and joint rates, fares, charges, regulations or practices, applicable to the transportation of passengers by common carriers by motor vehicle, or the maxima or minima, to be charged, and the terms and conditions under which the through routes shall be operated.

Whenever, after hearing, upon complaint or upon its own initiative, the commission is of opinion that the divisions of joint rates, fares or charges, applicable to the transportation of passengers by common carriers by motor vehicle or by such carriers in conjunction with common carriers by railroad or express, or water are, or will be unjust, unreasonable, inequitable or unduly preferential or prejudicial as between the carriers parties thereto (whether agreed upon by such carriers, or any of them, or otherwise established), the commission shall by order prescribe the just, reasonable and equitable divisions thereof to be received by the several carriers. In cases where the joint rate, fare or charge was established pursuant to a finding or order of the commission and the divisions thereof are found by it to have been unjust, unreasonable or inequitable, or unduly preferential or prejudicial, the commission may also by order determine what would have been the just, reasonable and equitable divisions thereof to be received by the several carriers, and require adjustment to be made in accordance with the order, from the date of filing the complaint or entry of order of investigation or such other date subsequent as the commission finds justified and, in the case of joint rates prescribed by the commission, the order as to divisions may be made effective as a part of the original order.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7660, 7661; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 16; Laws, 2004, ch. 501, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 77-7-219.
Suspension of rates proposed by common carriers.

Whenever there shall be filed with the commission any schedule stating a new individual or joint rate, fare, charge or classification for the transportation of passengers by a common carrier or carriers by motor vehicle, or by any such carrier or carriers in conjunction with a common carrier or carriers by railroad, express or water, or any rule, regulation or practice affecting such rate, fare or charge, or the value of the service thereunder, the commission is hereby authorized and empowered, upon complaint of any interested party or upon its own initiative, if it so orders, without answer or other formal pleading by the interested carrier or carriers, but upon reasonable notice, to enter upon a hearing concerning the lawfulness of such rate, fare or charge, or such rule, regulation or practice, and pending such hearing and the decision thereon the commission, by filing with such schedule and delivering to the carrier or carriers affected thereby, a statement in writing of its reasons for such suspension, may suspend the operation of such schedule and defer the use of such rate, fare or charge, or such rule, regulation or practice, for a period of ninety (90) days. If the proceeding has not been concluded and a final order made within such period, the commission may, from time to time, extend the period of suspension by order, but not for a longer period in the aggregate than one hundred eighty (180) days beyond the time when it would otherwise go into effect. After hearing, whether completed before or after the rate, fare, charge, classification, rule, regulation or practice goes into effect, the commission may make such order with reference thereto as would be proper in a proceeding instituted after it had become effective. If the proceeding has not been concluded and an order made within the period of suspension, the proposed change of rate, fare or charge, or classification, rule, regulation or practice shall go into effect at the end of such period.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7662; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 17; Laws, 2004, ch. 501, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 77-7-221.
Factors to be considered by commission in considering rates of common carriers.

In the exercise of its power to prescribe just and reasonable rates for the transportation of passengers by common carriers by motor vehicle, the commission shall give due consideration, among other factors, to the inherent advantages of transportation by such carriers; to the effect of rates upon the movement of traffic by such carriers; to the need, in the public interest, of adequate and efficient transportation service by such carriers at the lowest cost consistent with the furnishing of such services; and to the need of revenues sufficient to enable such carriers, under honest, economical and efficient management, to provide such service.

In any proceeding to determine the justness or reasonableness of any rate, fare or charge of any such carrier, there shall not be taken into consideration or allowed as evidence or elements of value of the property of such carrier, either goodwill, earning power, or the certificate under which such carrier is operating. In applying for and receiving a certificate under this chapter, any such carrier shall be deemed to have agreed to the provisions of this paragraph, on its own behalf and on behalf of all transferees or lessees of such certificate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7663, 7664; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 18; Laws, 2004, ch. 501, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 77-7-223.
Other rights and remedies unaffected by foregoing.

Nothing in Sections 77-7-151, 77-7-153, 77-7-187, 77-7-217 to 77-7-221, shall be held to extinguish any remedy or right of action not inconsistent therewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7665; Laws, 1938, ch. 142.